Hawaii, session 2026, HB1240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $80,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the thirteenth representative district, as follows: 1.   Paia elementary school Plans, design, and construction for the expansion of Paia elementary school. Plans                        $1,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                $28,000,000 Total funding                    $30,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 2.   Hana highway Plans and construction for the repair of Hana highway. Plans                          $200,000 Construction                 $9,800,000 Total funding                    $10,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 3.   Lanai airport Plans and construction for a taxiway at Lanai airport. Plans                        $1,000,000 Construction                 $9,000,000 Total funding                    $10,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 4.   Molokai highway Plans, design, and construction for repairs and maintenance of sections of roadway in east Molokai that have deteriorated due to flooding, river diversions, erosion, and sea level rise. Plans                        $1,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                 $8,000,000 Total funding                    $10,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 5.   Molokai highway Construction for filling or removal of rumble strips from the center of the road in east Molokai. Construction                   $500,000 Total funding                       $500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 6.   Paia bypass Plans, design, and construction for Paia bypass. Plans                        $5,000,000 Design                       $5,000,000 Construction                $10,000,000 Total funding                    $20,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________